Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-715
Tracking system; department; duties; use authorized.

The department shall retain all information from all reports of suspected child abuse or neglect required by section 28-711 and all records generated as a result of such reports in a tracking system of child protection cases. The tracking system shall be used for statistical purposes as well as a reference for future investigations if subsequent reports of child abuse or neglect are made involving the same victim or subject of a report of child abuse or neglect.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 154;

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 46;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 6.